West Virginia, session 2026, HB4230.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of homeland Security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-29-3 of this code, modified by the Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Governor's Committee on Crime, Delinquency, and Correction (law enforcement training and certification standards, 149 CSR 02), is authorized.